Illinois, session 104th, SB1792.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Warnings on generative artificial intelligence 8systems.9    (a) As used in this section:10    "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system 11that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from the 12input it receives, how to generate outputs, such as 13predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions that can 14influence physical or virtual environments. "Artificial 15intelligence" includes generative artificial intelligence.16    "Generative artificial intelligence" means an automated 17computing system that, when provided with human prompts, 18descriptions, or queries, can produce outputs that simulate 19human-produced content, including, but not limited to, the 20following:21        (1) textual outputs, such as short answers, essays, 22    poetry, or longer compositions or answers;23        (2) image outputs, such as fine art, photographs,   SB1792- 2 -LRB104 09277 SPS 19335 b1    conceptual art, diagrams, and other images;2        (3) multimedia outputs, such as audio or video in the 3    form of compositions, songs, or short-form or long-form 4    audio or video; and5        (4) other content that would otherwise be produced by 6    human means.7    "Generative artificial intelligence system" means any 8artificial intelligence system whose primary function is to 9generate content, including, but not limited to, code, text, 10and images.11    (b) The owner, licensee, or operator of a generative 12artificial intelligence system shall conspicuously display a 13warning on the system's user interface that is reasonably 14calculated to consistently apprise the user that the outputs 15of the generative artificial intelligence system may be 16inaccurate or inappropriate.17    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 18practice within the meaning of this Act.